Massachusetts, session 194th, S1280.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 119 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 33C the
following new section:-
Section 33D. A special commission is hereby established for the purposes of making an
investigation and study relative to providers of comprehensive foster care in the commonwealth,
contracted by the department of children and families, in obtaining and maintaining the costs and
additional burdens, such as administrative and programmatic, in obtaining and maintaining foster
care liability insurance. The commission shall consist of the following members or their
designees: the chairs of the joint committee on children, families & persons with disabilities or
their designees, who will serve as chairs; the secretary of health and human services or a
designee; the commissioner of the division of Insurance or a designee; the commissioner of the
of 3

department of children and families or a designee; the chair of the foster care caucus or their
designee; a representative from the office of the child advocate; a representative of insurance
provider(s) of foster care liability insurance in the state of Massachusetts; a representative from
two providers of comprehensive foster care, appointed by the children’s league of
Massachusetts; a representative from the children’s league of Massachusetts or a designee; 3
members to be appointed by the chairs as recommended by the children’s league of
Massachusetts, 1 of whom shall be a family member of a child or adolescent who has or is
receiving comprehensive foster care services; and 1 of whom shall be an individual who has
served as a comprehensive foster care parent. In making appointments, to the maximum extent
feasible, ensure that the commission represents a broad distribution of diverse perspectives and
geographic regions.
The commission shall: (i) compile data concerning the cost of insurance liability for
foster care providers in Massachusetts and nationally, (ii) recent data on in-state and out-of-state
insurance claims for comprehensive foster care providers; (iii) examine the current availability
of, and barriers to obtaining, foster care liability insurance; (iv) examine existing efforts
undertaken by healthcare providers, specifically foster care providers, and the existing body of
research around best practices for insuring foster care providers in neighboring states and
nationwide; (iv) solicit information and input as needed from providers, insurance carriers, and
any other parties or entities deemed appropriate; (v) examine other matters deemed appropriate
by the commission; and (vi) determine appropriate solution(s) within Massachusetts to alleviate
the pressures faced by foster care providers due to the financial and other burdens of holding
foster care liability insurance.
of 3

All appointments shall be made not later than 30 days after the effective date of this
resolve.
The commission shall submit its findings and recommendations for legislation to the
clerks of the senate and the house of representatives no later than October 1, 2025.
of 3